Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB110.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1, 1.1(a)(2), (3), (4), (5) and (7) introductory paragraph and 1.2(d) of the act of February 13, 1970 (P.L.19, No.10), entitled "An act enabling certain minors to consent to medical, dental and health services, declaring consent unnecessary under certain circumstances," are amended to read:Section 1. Individual Consent.--Any minor who is eighteen years of age or older[, or has graduated from high school, or has married, or has been pregnant,] may give effective consent to medical, dental and health services for himself or herself, and the consent of no other person shall be necessary.1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 1.1. Mental Health Treatment.--(a) The following shall apply to consent for voluntary inpatient and outpatient mental health treatment:* * *(2) A minor who is [fourteen] eighteen years of age or older may consent on the minor's own behalf to voluntary inpatient mental health treatment as provided under Article II of the "Mental Health Procedures Act" or outpatient mental health treatment, and the minor's parent's or legal guardian's consent shall not be necessary.(3) A minor or another parent or legal guardian may not abrogate consent provided by a parent or legal guardian on the minor's behalf to voluntary inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment under paragraph (1), nor may a parent or legal guardian abrogate consent given by the minor on the minor's own behalf to voluntary inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment under paragraph (2).(4) A parent or legal guardian who has provided consent to voluntary inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment under paragraph (1) may revoke that consent, which revocation shall be effective unless the minor who is [fourteen to] eighteen years of age or older has provided consent for continued voluntary inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment.(5) A minor who is [fourteen to] eighteen years of age or older who has provided consent to voluntary inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment may revoke that consent[, which revocation shall be effective unless the parent or legal guardian to the minor has provided for continued treatment under paragraph (1)].* * *20250HB0110PN0088 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) When a petition is filed on behalf of a minor [fourteen years of age or older and] under eighteen years of age who has been confined for inpatient treatment on the consent of a parent or legal guardian and who objects to continued inpatient treatment by requesting a withdrawal from or modification of treatment, the court shall promptly appoint an attorney for the minor and schedule a hearing to be held within seventy-two hours following the filing of the petition, unless continued upon the request of the attorney for the minor, by a judge or mental health review officer who shall determine whether or not the voluntary mental health treatment is in the best interest of the minor. For inpatient treatment to continue against the minor's wishes, the court must find all of the following by clear and convincing evidence:* * *Section 1.2. Release of Medical Records.--* * *(d) Except to the extent provided under subsection (a), (b) or (c) or section 1.3, the minor shall control the release of the minor's mental health treatment records and information to the extent allowed by law. When a minor has provided consent to outpatient mental health treatment under section 1.1, subject to subsection (a)(2), the minor shall control the records of treatment to the same extent as the minor would control the records of inpatient care or involuntary outpatient care under the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the "Mental Health Procedures Act," and its regulations.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1.3. Parent or Legal Guardian Access to Medical Records.--A parent or legal guardian of a minor under eighteen 20250HB0110PN0088 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 years of age shall have full access to the minor's medical, dental or health services or mental health treatment records.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0110PN0088 - 4 - 123